Virginia statutes. Title 62.1. Waters of the State, Ports and Harbors.
Chapter 6.1.
Ohio River Basin Commission.

Sec.

62.1-79.1. Participation by Commonwealth authorized.

62.1-79.2. Appointment, terms and expenses of member and alternate.

62.1-79.2.

§ 62.1-79.1. Participation by Commonwealth authorized.

The General Assembly of Virginia hereby recognizes the establishment of the Ohio River Basin Commission, declares that its purpose is within the best interests of the Commonwealth of Virginia and authorizes participation by the Commonwealth in its activities.

(1972, c. 294.)

The numbers of

§§

62.1-79.1

and

62.1-79.2 were assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the 1972 act having assigned no numbers.

Michie's Jurisprudence.

- For related discussion, see 20 M.J. Waters and Watercourses,

§

3.

§ 62.1-79.2. Appointment, terms and expenses of member and alternate.

The Governor of Virginia shall appoint from the Commonwealth at large one citizen who shall serve as a member of the Ohio River Basin Commission and one citizen who shall serve as an alternate member of such Commission. The terms of both appointments shall be for four years and, upon expiration, their successors shall be appointed in the same manner. Members and alternate members of this Commission representing the Commonwealth of Virginia shall receive no compensation for their services, but shall be reimbursed for their actual expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.

(1972, c. 294.)

§ 62.1-79.2.

OHIO RIVER BASIN COMMISSION OF 1972

________

ACTS OF ASSEMBLY, 1972

CHAPTER 294

An Act to authorize participation in the Ohio River Basin Commission; to authorize the Governor to make certain appointments to such Commission and to fix the terms and compensation of appointees; and to appropriate funds.

[H 493]

Approved April 1, 1972

Whereas, on February thirteen, nineteen hundred seventy-one, President Richard M. Nixon issued Executive Order 11578, establishing the Ohio River Basin Commission; and

Whereas, the jurisdiction of such Commission extends to potions of the Commonwealth of Virginia and other states with lands lying within the Ohio River drainage basin; and

Whereas, Executive Order 11578 provides that one citizen of the Commonwealth of Virginia shall serve on the membership of such Commission when authorized by the Virginia General Assembly to do so; and

Whereas, Virginia has participated in and been consulted by the Commission on all matters affecting that portion of Virginia lying within the Ohio River Basin since the official formation of the Commission; now, therefore,

Be it enacted by the General Assembly of Virginia:

§ 1. The General Assembly of Virginia hereby recognizes the establishment of the Ohio River Basin Commission, declares that its purpose is within the best interests of the Commonwealth of Virginia and authorizes participation by the Commonwealth in its activities.

§ 2

The Governor of Virginia shall appoint from the States at large one citizen who shall serve as a member of the Ohio River Basin Commission and one citizen who shall serve as an alternate member of such Commission. The terms of both appointments shall be for four years and, upon expiration, their successors shall be appointed in the same manner. Members and alternate members of this Commission representing the Commonwealth of Virginia shall receive no compensation for their services, but shall be reimbursed for their actual expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.

§ 3

There is hereby appropriated from the General Fund of the State treasury the sum of sixteen thousand two hundred fifty dollars ($16,250) for participation in the Ohio River Basin Commission, of which six thousand two hundred fifty dollars ($6,250) shall be for participation during the fiscal years nineteen hundred seventy-one and nineteen hundred seventy-two and ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for the 1972-74 biennium.